tortoisesvn/ext/spell/he_IL.dic
אאפשר/b
אביביות/a
אבלף/b
אגד/a
אגמגם/b
אגרונום/a
אדמדמה/a
אדנג/b
אהובות/a
אובק/b
אודיטוריום/a
אוזון/a
אוחזרו/b
אויבת/a
אוכזבתן/b
אומנית/a
אונע/b
אוספת/a
אופיינית/a
אוצנח/b
אורגזמה/a
אורקולי/a
אושררה/b
אזור/a
אזלתן/b
אחזור/a
אחייט/b
אטוח/b
אטים/a
איגמה/b
איד/a
איחמץ/b
איטומים/a
אילנות/a
אימנתי/b
אימפריאליסטיות/a
אינהרנטית/a
אינטרנטי/a
אינפלציה/a
אירוסין/a
איששתם/b
אכופה/a
אכרע/b
אלגוריתם/a
אליהם/a
אללי/a
אלקטרומגנטיים/a
אמולסיות/a
אמוסגר/b
אמנציפציה/a
אמתיק/b
אמתלות/a
אנוכי/a
אנטישמית/a
אננס/a
אנעם/b
אסדות/a
אסחף/b
אסייתיות/a
אספקלריה/a
אסתמם/b
אעצב/b
אפופות/a
אפייס/b
אפיפיות/a
אפרורי/a
אפשרתן/b
אצטלאות/a
אצניע/b
אקוויוולנטיים/a
אקטיביסטיות/a
אקלס/b
אקספרסיוניזם/a
ארגזים/a
ארוץ/b
ארכיב/a
ארסי/a
אשדרג/b
אשכל/b
אשלגן/a
אשתולל/b
אתבושש/b
אתור/b
אתכרסם/b
אתנתק/b
אתקדם/b
אתרים/a
בדרניות/a
בהקת/b
בוטים/a
בונאמה/b
בוסתן/a
בזיליקום/a
בחנתי/b
ביוכימיה/a
ביכיתי/b
בינרי/a
בישמת/b
בלוי/a
במאית/a
בציר/a
ברזלים/a
ג'ודו/a
גאו/b
גבייה/a
גובים/a
גוירתי/b
גונית/a
גזז/b
גזירה/a
גיל/a
גילפתן/b
גלוחים/a
גנאלוגיות/a
גנזתי/b
גרביטציה/a
גרסבנה/a
דבשות/a
דובגתן/b
דוגמים/a
דונמים/a
דושנתי/b
דיאלקטיות/a
דימונאיות/a
דישנתם/b
דלוקות/a
דעתן/a
דרוויניסטיים/a
האפלה/a
הבטנו/b
הגזמה/a
הדרגתיות/a
הואדרת/b
הובהרנו/b
הוברזת/b
הוגמשתי/b
הודחקנו/b
הוזלפה/b
הוחטאת/b
הוחרמו/b
הוטסת/b
הוכמנת/b
הוכתבו/b
הולקית/b
הומות/a
הומרץ/b
הונפקנו/b
הוסלמתן/b
הועזבו/b
הוערתי/b
הופנטת/b
הופרטו/b
הוצלבנו/b
הוקהה/b
הוקפתם/b
הורגלתן/b
הורצת/b
הושווינו/b
הושמדת/b
הושרתה/b
הותקלנו/b
הזדקפויות/a
הזדתן/b
החתלות/a
הטיתן/b
היגרמויות/a
היחפזויות/a
היללה/b
הימשות/a
היעלם/a
היקפיות/a
הכאה/a
הכרענו/b
הלכתיים/a
הנגנות/a
הסוויתן/b
הספק/a
הסתלבטתי/b
העלאה/a
העקנו/b
הפרדות/a
הצטדקתם/b
הצעדות/a
הצתי/b
הרהור/a
הריתי/b
הרשעות/a
השקיתם/b
השתבטות/a
השתטה/b
השתפלתי/b
השתרגויות/a
התאוששת/b
התבאסת/b
התבוששות/a
התבקשת/b
התגמשת/b
התהללות/a
התווספתם/b
התחסלתם/b
התייהדויות/a
התייחמתם/b
התכחשתם/b
התלכלכתן/b
התלפפויות/a
התמסרתם/b
התנוולתם/b
התנופפויות/a
התנקשתי/b
התעמעמתם/b
התעסקויות/a
התפוצצתם/b
התפקעת/b
התפשטויות/a
התקלפתן/b
התרגשתי/b
התרופפויות/a
התרציתי/b
וייטנאמי/a
ז'נר/a
זוועתיים/a
זוככת/b
זיו/a
זיככתן/b
זמן/a
זרוקה/a
זרחתם/b
חבצלת/a
חובלות/a
חויבת/b
חולטים/a
חוף/a
חושבות/a
חושלת/b
חטוטרת/a
חיטט/b
חיילים/a
חיפיתן/b
חישוף/a
חליפות/a
חמיקה/a
חנטרשתן/b
חנפנית/a
חפצה/a
חרוט/a
חשבוניים/a
חשדתי/b
חתם/a
טובלים/a
טופחה/b
טורדות/a
טייסת/a
טלטלות/a
טלפנתי/b
טעימות/a
טרומבונים/a
טרנסילבנית/a
יאווררו/b
יאיישו/b
יבדה/b
יבטשו/b
יגאלו/b
יגיה/b
ידבבו/b
ידידה/a
ידללו/b
יהססו/b
יוגנב/b
יוחוורו/b
יוכלב/b
יונח/b
יוניצ"ף/a
יועם/b
יוצבה/b
יורדמו/b
יושמשו/b
יזדרזו/b
יזקן/b
יחוסרו/b
יחממו/b
יחצניות/a
יחשקו/b
יטפול/b
ייבנה/b
יידקר/b
ייזעק/b
ייטו/b
יימוחו/b
ייסבו/b
ייעתקו/b
ייקום/b
יישטף/b
יכדרר/b
יכסוס/b
ילוחכו/b
ילידים/a
ימולו/b
ימנע/b
ינביטו/b
ינושל/b
ינקבו/b
יסוככו/b
יסלימו/b
יסתווגו/b
יעולל/b
יענבו/b
יפגמו/b
יפטירו/b
יפצפץ/b
יצאתי/b
יצטמצמו/b
יציעים/a
יצקתי/b
יקורר/b
יקצב/b
ירובב/b
ירסס/b
ישבח/b
ישובות/a
ישולח/b
ישיח/b
ישסף/b
ישתה/b
ישתקשק/b
יתבהם/b
יתגשמו/b
יתוקשרו/b
יתחשמל/b
יתכתש/b
יתמרד/b
יתעב/b
יתפוקקו/b
יתקיימו/b
יתרכך/b
כביש/a
כוחניות/a
כוסח/b
כורעת/a
כיחשתן/b
כינוסים/a
כלייה/a
כנסת/a
כפלתי/b
כרוז/a
כשרים/a
לבלרים/a
לוגמת/a
לוכדתן/b
לוף/a
ליברליים/a
ליטשתי/b
לכלוכים/a
לצים/a
מאגרפת/a
מאויתות/a
מאותרת/a
מאמינה/a
מאששים/a
מבוימות/a
מבחינים/a
מבסוטים/a
מבתקת/a
מגודרים/a
מגי/a
מגנט/a
מדבריות/a
מדופלם/a
מדליפות/a
מדשנים/a
מהירויות/a
מואפל/a
מוברגת/a
מודברות/a
מודרה/b
מוודים/a
מוחה/a
מוטב/a
מוכמנים/a
מולט/a
מונאת/a
מונקים/a
מוסמסת/b
מוסרני/a
מועשר/a
מופרדים/a
מוצפן/a
מוקפות/a
מורכבות/a
מושגיות/a
מושעים/a
מותקף/a
מזהמים/a
מזילה/a
מזפתים/a
מחווירות/a
מחופש/a
מחייבת/a
מחמיר/a
מחרוזת/a
מטבחון/a
מטחנה/a
מטרדים/a
מיגן/b
מיהם/a
מיושרות/a
מייסדים/a
מיליטריסטיים/a
מיענתן/b
מיצג/a
מכבייה/a
מכושף/a
מכנה/a
מכשלות/a
מלודרמטי/a
מלחששים/a
מלקקת/a
ממומשות/a
ממותגים/a
מממן/a
ממרכז/a
מנדות/a
מנוכרים/a
מנותקים/a
מנמנם/a
מנשלת/a
מסוגלות/a
מסוע/a
מסטלת/b
מסיימות/a
מסמלת/a
מסרטן/a
מסתלסלים/a
מעדיפים/a
מעוננת/a
מעיף/a
מעפעפות/a
מעשבת/a
מפויסת/a
מפורשים/a
מפית/a
מפעילות/a
מפריעה/a
מצבים/a
מצונפות/a
מצטמצם/a
מצליח/a
מצקצק/a
מקודשים/a
מקורית/a
מקלטרות/a
מקפלים/a
מקררות/a
מרואיין/a
מרוקאי/a
מריר/a
מרפק/a
משאיות/a
משובטים/a
משוכלת/a
משופצרות/a
משחקייה/a
משכירה/a
משמנות/a
משפטניות/a
משרטטות/a
משתחררים/a
משתעממת/a
מתאוורר/a
מתארך/a
מתבצרים/a
מתגנבות/a
מתודיות/a
מתומררים/a
מתחדדים/a
מתחצפות/a
מתיימרות/a
מתכונן/a
מתלטשת/a
מתממשת/a
מתנגשת/a
מתנצלות/a
מתעללת/a
מתעשרת/a
מתפנצ'רים/a
מתקדשים/a
מתקררים/a
מתריס/a
נאובחן/b
נאחזות/a
נאמדנו/b
נבאשתם/b
נבואיים/a
נבייץ/b
נבראת/a
נגאלתם/b
נגליתם/b
נגניות/a
נגשתם/b
נדל"ניים/a
נדם/b
נהפוך/b
נואשות/a
נודבתי/b
נוחות/a
נוטרתם/b
נוסינו/b
נועלות/a
נופקת/b
נוקרש/b
נורשת/a
נותסס/b
נזמרו/b
נזקקות/a
נחוד/b
נחלקתן/b
נחמצת/a
נחקקתן/b
נטבחות/a
נטבעתם/b
נטרפד/b
ניגדת/b
ניגח/a
ניווטתי/b
ניטווה/b
ניכויים/a
ניכתב/b
ניספח/b
ניצחנו/b
ניקמות/a
נישאל/b
ניתצת/b
נכליא/b
נכללים/a
נכתים/b
נלפתו/b
נלקחות/a
נמחקו/b
נמענת/a
נמצצו/b
ננוהל/b
ננצור/b
נסב/a
נסויג/b
נסמלץ/b
נסרקת/a
נסתמה/b
נעטה/b
נעצרתן/b
נעקרת/a
נפגעתם/b
נפלתי/b
נפסלות/a
נפרמתי/b
נצחצח/b
נציים/a
נצפתה/b
נקושות/a
נקטב/b
נקצוף/b
נרגע/a
נרדפתן/b
נרעשה/b
נרתמת/a
נשאתם/b
נשורש/b
נשלות/a
נשלמנו/b
נשקוד/b
נשתית/b
נתבדר/b
נתדלדל/b
נתחייבתן/b
נתין/a
נתלחלח/b
נתנפח/b
נתפענח/b
נתקשר/b
סבלן/a
סואן/a
סובסדת/b
סוטר/a
סומלצה/b
סופדים/a
סורבתי/b
סחבת/a
סטנד/a
סיומת/a
סיכלתי/b
סימולטנית/a
סיפונים/a
סירבנו/b
סלולרית/a
סמלוץ/a
סנפיר/a
ספקולטיבי/a
סקסואלית/a
סקרת/b
סתווניות/a
עגלונים/a
עוועים/a
עוכלו/b
עוקצים/a
עורבבת/b
עיגול/a
עיכבו/b
עיראקית/a
עלבתן/b
עלעול/a
ענישה/a
עצמה/a
ערופות/a
עשיריים/a
עשקת/b
פדגוגי/a
פוחלץ/a
פולגו/b
פולקלוריים/a
פועות/a
פורגנתם/b
פורנוגרפיה/a
פחם/a
פיגענו/b
פיה/a
פיליפינים/a
פיניתי/b
פירט/a
פישרתי/b
פלייה/a
פנדות/a
פסוריאזיס/a
פסנתרנים/a
פצעת/b
פקועה/a
פרובוקטורית/a
פרומילים/a
פריבילגיות/a
פרנואידיים/a
פשטידה/a
צ'וקמקה/b
צ'חצ'ח/a
צדדים/a
צולל/a
צומצמה/b
צי/a
ציננתי/b
ציצה/a
צמחית/a
צפה/a
צרכנויות/a
צררת/b
קדוש/a
קודם/a
קולוקוויומים/a
קוממת/b
קומפקטי/a
קונסרבטיביים/a
קופצנות/a
קוששתי/b
קטומות/a
קידושים/a
קילל/b
קיצובים/a
קיצרנו/b
קליגרפיה/a
קמוץ/a
קניבליות/a
קפריזית/a
קרואטית/a
קריסות/a
קרמתם/b
קשיח/a
רב"ט/a
רגרסיביים/a
רוגז/a
רודד/b
רולדות/a
רוקרית/a
רושתו/b
ריאתיים/a
ריכזת/b
ריקנים/a
ריתך/b
רמדאן/a
רעלניות/a
רפתנית/a
רקטורית/a
שאל/b
שאלונים/a
שגויים/a
שובת/a
שודרג/b
שוכתבנו/b
שולחות/a
שופדתם/b
שוקט/a
שורשת/b
שחורות/a
שיבוטים/a
שיגרתי/b
שיכלתן/b
שילוטים/a
שיער/b
שכבה/a
שכללתן/b
שלום/a
שמוט/a
שנונות/a
שפיטים/a
שצפתי/b
שקריות/a
שררות/a
תאגדתי/b
תאוימי/b
תאומים/a
תאזינו/b
תאמוד/b
תארס/b
תבוזבזו/b
תבזבזו/b
תבלוש/b
תבריזו/b
תגהקי/b
תגורפו/b
תגמיש/b
תגרשי/b
תדהר/a
תדוגי/b
תדלדל/b
תדשני/b
תהנדסי/b
תובאש/b
תוגדשו/b
תודפסו/b
תוזרענה/b
תוחרף/b
תוכחש/b
תולהבנה/b
תומרדו/b
תוניסאית/a
תוסדרנה/b
תועמדנה/b
תופללי/b
תוצהר/b
תוקנתי/b
תורדמי/b
תושג/b
תושקטנה/b
תותבות/a
תזדהם/b
תזוין/b
תזמנת/b
תחבוקנה/b
תחויטנה/b
תחזיר/b
תחלים/b
תחמוצת/a
תחסנה/b
תחרכי/b
תטוהרו/b
תטמון/b
תיאותנה/b
תיבזקנה/b
תיגמלי/b
תידפק/b
תיוחלי/b
תיזנח/b
תיחסם/b
תיטלטלי/b
תייסדי/b
תיכנסי/b
תימזגי/b
תימנייה/a
תינגסנה/b
תיסדו/b
תיעזב/b
תיפגשי/b
תיצלבי/b
תיקצבי/b
תירשי/b
תישמדנה/b
תיתקענה/b
תכופפנה/b
תכמהו/b
תכרכי/b
תלאה/a
תלובה/b
תלכלך/b
תמודרנה/b
תמורכז/b
תמליח/b
תמסחים/a
תמפי/b
תמתחו/b
תנהרי/b
תנופק/b
תניידו/b
תנצח/b
תסאבנה/b
תסויד/b
תסורסו/b
תסלים/b
תספחנה/b
תסתווגנה/b
תסתרנה/b
תעוכבנה/b
תעזיבי/b
תעמקנה/b
תענוגות/a
תערבו/b
תפגשנה/b
תפטרלי/b
תפקיר/b
תצדקי/b
תצהירים/a
תצטרפנה/b
תקבענה/b
תקיימנה/b
תקרקעו/b
תקשורתי/a
תרוששי/b
תרקוק/b
תשואות/a
תשודלו/b
תשותכנה/b
תשלפי/b
תשרבט/b
תשתמדי/b
תתאסלם/b
תתגונני/b
תתוירנה/b
תתחננה/b
תתכהי/b
תתמכר/b
תתנפחי/b
תתערב/b
תתפרשנה/b
תתרדדנה/b
